Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6008
Definitions, where found.

As used in the Nebraska Nursing Home Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 71-6010 to 71-6017.01 shall apply.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 782, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 38.